Hawaii statutes.
§266-21.4 Marine inspections. (a) The
department shall (1) develop a list of minimum requirements for the marine
inspection of vessels seeking permits to moor in state commercial harbors, (2)
approve qualified marine surveyors to inspect vessels seeking permits to moor
in state commercial harbors, and (3) approve a fee schedule for marine
surveyors' inspections.

(b) Vessels failing the marine inspection for
a permit or a permit renewal shall have thirty days to correct deficiencies and
complete the inspection.

(c) Owners of vessels that fail the marine
inspection may contest the inspection at an arbitration board of three approved
inspectors and the original inspector. [L 1976, c 221, §8; am L 1991, c 272,
§11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next